udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N9 Y 324 # "син" (-м-)
SFX N9 0 э с  # ед.ч.
SFX N9 0 е ш
SFX N9 0 эд с
SFX N9 0 ед ш
SFX N9 0 эз с
SFX N9 0 ез ш
SFX N9 0 мы н # синмы - мой глаз
SFX N9 0 мыд н # синмыд - твой глаз
SFX N9 0 мыз н # синмыз - его глаз
SFX N9 0 ты [сш]
SFX N9 0 ды н
SFX N9 0 сы [сш]
SFX N9 0 зы н
SFX N9 0 ме . # 1 лицо вин.п.
SFX N9 0 мес .
SFX N9 0 тэ [сш] # 2 л.
SFX N9 0 дэ н
SFX N9 0 тэс [сш]
SFX N9 0 дэс н
SFX N9 0 сэ [сш] # 3 л.
SFX N9 0 зэ н
SFX N9 0 сэс [сш]
SFX N9 0 зэс н
SFX N9 0 эз н
SFX N9 0 лэн . # род.п.
SFX N9 0 элэн с
SFX N9 0 эдлэн с
SFX N9 0 эзлэн с
SFX N9 0 елэн ш
SFX N9 0 едлэн ш
SFX N9 0 езлэн ш
SFX N9 0 мылэн н
SFX N9 0 тылэн [сш]
SFX N9 0 дылэн н
SFX N9 0 мыдлэн н
SFX N9 0 сылэн [сш]
SFX N9 0 зылэн н
SFX N9 0 мызлэн н
SFX N9 0 лэсь . # разд.п.
SFX N9 0 элэсь с
SFX N9 0 эдлэсь с
SFX N9 0 эзлэсь с
SFX N9 0 елэсь ш
SFX N9 0 едлэсь ш
SFX N9 0 езлэсь ш
SFX N9 0 мылэсь н
SFX N9 0 мыдлэсь н
SFX N9 0 тылэсь [сш]
SFX N9 0 дылэсь н
SFX N9 0 мызлэсь н
SFX N9 0 сылэсь [сш]
SFX N9 0 зылэсь н
SFX N9 0 лы . # дат.п.
SFX N9 0 элы [нс] # синэлы - ?
SFX N9 0 эдлы с
SFX N9 0 эзлы с
SFX N9 0 елы ш
SFX N9 0 едлы ш
SFX N9 0 езлы ш
SFX N9 0 мылы н
SFX N9 0 мыдлы н
SFX N9 0 мызлы н
SFX N9 0 тылы [сш]
SFX N9 0 дылы н # синдылы - не исп., но можно
SFX N9 0 сылы [сш]
SFX N9 0 зылы н # синзылы - не исп., но можно
SFX N9 0 тэк . # лиш.п.
SFX N9 0 этэк с
SFX N9 0 эдтэк с
SFX N9 0 эзтэк с
SFX N9 0 етэк ш
SFX N9 0 едтэк ш
SFX N9 0 езтэк ш
SFX N9 0 мытэк н
SFX N9 0 мыдтэк н
SFX N9 0 мызтэк н
SFX N9 0 тытэк [сш]
SFX N9 0 дытэк н
SFX N9 0 сытэк [сш]
SFX N9 0 зытэк н
SFX N9 0 ъя . # соотв.п.
SFX N9 0 эя с
SFX N9 0 эдъя с
SFX N9 0 эзъя с
SFX N9 0 ея ш
SFX N9 0 едъя ш
SFX N9 0 езъя ш
SFX N9 0 мыя н
SFX N9 0 мыдъя н
SFX N9 0 мызъя н
SFX N9 0 тыя [сш]
SFX N9 0 дыя н
SFX N9 0 сыя [сш]
SFX N9 0 зыя н
SFX N9 0 эн с # твор.п.
SFX N9 0 ен ш
SFX N9 0 эным с
SFX N9 0 эныд с
SFX N9 0 эныз с
SFX N9 0 еным ш
SFX N9 0 еныд ш
SFX N9 0 еныз ш
SFX N9 0 энымы с
SFX N9 0 эныды с
SFX N9 0 энызы с
SFX N9 0 енымы ш
SFX N9 0 еныды ш
SFX N9 0 енызы ш
SFX N9 0 мын н
SFX N9 0 мыным н
SFX N9 0 мыныд н
SFX N9 0 мыныз н
SFX N9 0 мынымы н
SFX N9 0 мыныды н
SFX N9 0 мынызы н
SFX N9 0 ын [^н] # местн.п.+ входн.п.
SFX N9 0 ам [^н]
SFX N9 0 мам н
SFX N9 0 мамы н
SFX N9 0 амы [^н]
SFX N9 0 ад [^н]
SFX N9 0 мад н
SFX N9 0 ады [^н]
SFX N9 0 мады н
SFX N9 0 аз [^н]
SFX N9 0 маз н
SFX N9 0 азы [^н]
SFX N9 0 мазы н
SFX N9 0 ысь . # исходн.п.
SFX N9 0 мысь н
SFX N9 0 ысьтым .
SFX N9 0 мысьтым н
SFX N9 0 ысьтымы .
SFX N9 0 ысьтыд .
SFX N9 0 мысьтыд н
SFX N9 0 ысьтыды .
SFX N9 0 ысьтыз .
SFX N9 0 мысьтыз н
SFX N9 0 ысьтызы .
SFX N9 0 ысен [^н] # отдал.п.
SFX N9 0 мысен н
SFX N9 0 ысеным [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысеным н
SFX N9 0 ысенымы [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысенымы н
SFX N9 0 ысеныд [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысеныд н
SFX N9 0 ысеныды [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысеныды н
SFX N9 0 ысеныз [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысеныз н
SFX N9 0 ысенызы [^н]
SFX N9 0 мысенызы н
SFX N9 0 этӥ с # перех.п.
SFX N9 0 этӥм с
SFX N9 0 этӥмы с
SFX N9 0 этӥд с
SFX N9 0 этӥды с
SFX N9 0 этӥз с
SFX N9 0 этӥзы с
SFX N9 0 етӥ ш
SFX N9 0 етӥм ш
SFX N9 0 етӥмы ш
SFX N9 0 етӥд ш
SFX N9 0 етӥды ш
SFX N9 0 етӥз ш
SFX N9 0 етӥзы ш
SFX N9 0 тӥ [^н]
SFX N9 0 тӥм [^н]
SFX N9 0 мытӥ н
SFX N9 0 мытӥм н
SFX N9 0 мытӥмы н
SFX N9 0 тӥмы [^н]
SFX N9 0 тӥд [^н]
SFX N9 0 мытӥд н
SFX N9 0 мытӥды н
SFX N9 0 тӥды [^н]
SFX N9 0 тӥз [^н]
SFX N9 0 мытӥз н
SFX N9 0 мытӥзы н
SFX N9 0 тӥзы [^н]
SFX N9 0 лань . # направ.п."син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 элань с # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 эдлань с # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 эзлань с # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 елань ш
SFX N9 0 едлань ш
SFX N9 0 езлань ш
SFX N9 0 мылань н # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 мыдлань н # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 мызлань н # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 тылань [сш]
SFX N9 0 дылань н # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 сылань [сш]
SFX N9 0 зылань н # "син" - не исп.
SFX N9 0 озь [^н] # предельн.п.
SFX N9 0 мозь н
SFX N9 0 эозь с
SFX N9 0 эдозь с
SFX N9 0 эзозь с
SFX N9 0 еозь ш
SFX N9 0 едозь ш
SFX N9 0 езозь ш
SFX N9 0 озям [^н]
SFX N9 0 озямы [^н]
SFX N9 0 мозям н
SFX N9 0 мозямы н
SFX N9 0 озяд [^н]
SFX N9 0 озяды [^н]
SFX N9 0 мозяд н
SFX N9 0 мозяды н
SFX N9 0 озяз .
SFX N9 0 озязы .
SFX N9 0 мозяз н
SFX N9 0 мозязы н
SFX N9 0 мыозь . # синмыозь - ?
SFX N9 0 дыозь . # синдыозь - ?
SFX N9 0 зыозь . # синзыозь - ?
SFX N9 0 ъёс . # мн.ч.им.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыд .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсты .
SFX N9 0 ъёссы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыз . # вин.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсты .
SFX N9 0 ъёсме .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмес .
SFX N9 0 ъёстэ .
SFX N9 0 ъёстэс .
SFX N9 0 ъёссэ .
SFX N9 0 ъёссэс .
SFX N9 0 ъёслэн . # род.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсылэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдлэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызлэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмылэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёстылэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёссылэн .
SFX N9 0 ъёслэсь . # разд.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсылэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдлэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызлэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмылэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёстылэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёссылэсь .
SFX N9 0 ъёслы . # дат.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсылы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдлы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызлы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмылы .
SFX N9 0 ъёстылы .
SFX N9 0 ъёссылы .
SFX N9 0 ъёстэк . # лиш.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсытэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдтэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызтэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмытэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёстытэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёссытэк .
SFX N9 0 ъёсъя . # соотв.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсыя .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдъя .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызъя .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмыя .
SFX N9 0 ъёстыя .
SFX N9 0 ъёссыя .
SFX N9 0 ъёсын . # твор.п.+ местн.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсыным . # твор.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсынымы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыныд .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыныды .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыныз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсынызы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсам . # местн.п.+ входн.п
SFX N9 0 ъёсамы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсад .
SFX N9 0 ъёсады .
SFX N9 0 ъёсаз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсазы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсы . # входн.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсысь . # исходн.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтым .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтымы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтыд .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтыды .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтыз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысьтызы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысен . # отдал.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсысеным .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысенымы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысеныд .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысеныды .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысеныз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсысенызы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсэтӥ [^н] # перех.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥ .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥм .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥмы .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥд .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥды .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥз .
SFX N9 0 ъёстӥзы .
SFX N9 0 ъёслань . # направ.п."син" не исп.
SFX N9 0 ъёсылань .
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдлань .
SFX N9 0 ъёсызлань .
SFX N9 0 ъёсмылань .
SFX N9 0 ъёстылань .
SFX N9 0 ъёссылань .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозь [^н] # предельн.п.
SFX N9 0 ъёсыозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёсыдозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёсызозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёсмыозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёстыозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёссыозь [^н]
SFX N9 0 ъёсозям .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозямы .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозяд .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозяды .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозяз .
SFX N9 0 ъёсозязы .

SFX P1 Y 1 # частица - Pcle (pa)
SFX P1 0 0 .
