udm.dic
айбат/A1A2D1P1
ӟарт/A1A2N2P1
пыр/D1N2P1
тожо/D1P1
шол/D1P1
эйла/D1P1
эшшо/D1P1
луыса/G1P1
ай/I1P1
бӧбӧ/I1P1N2
неужто/I1P1
ну-ка/I1P1
о-о/I1P1
я-ка/I1P1
что/M1P1
бык/N2A1A2P1
вай/N2P1
вылэм/N2R1P1
дари/N2A1A2P1
зэм/N2A1A2D1P1
кем/N2D1P1
ни/N2P1
палан/N2P1
секта/N2P1
шай/N2P1
шоры/N2P1
ыкы/N2P1
эке/N2P1
яра/N2P1
дыр/N4P1
пал/N4P1
син/N9A1A2
абба/P1
адске/P1
айко/P1
акак/P1
акры/P1
акыр/P1A1A2
алай/P1
аминь/P1
арна/P1
ась/P1
ауал/P1
бен/P1
бо/P1
бон/P1
бугай/P1
буди/P1
быгай/P1
быри-быри/P1
вае/P1
ваелэ/P1
вай-ка/P1
ведь/P1
веть/P1
во/P1
вот/P1
всё-таки/P1
вылды/P1
гетэ/P1
гитэ/P1
гой/P1
гынэк/P1
давай/P1
даже/P1
дай/P1
дак/P1
драк/P1
етэ/P1
ӝык/P1
замлакаш/P1
занглакаш/P1
ӟан-ӟан/P1
ӟечбур/P1
ӟечбуресь/P1
ӟечесь/P1A1A2
ӟечесь-буресь/P1
ӟечом-буром/P1
и/P1
ик/P1
индэ/P1
ини/P1
иське/P1
как/P1
кемзэ/P1D1
керек/P1A1A2
керет/P1A1A2
керо/P1
коркапуш/P1
коть/P1
кылсярысь/P1
ла/P1
лабаса/P1
ло/P1
луоз/P1
луэмен/P1
лык/P1
лэся/P1
марошлы/P1
марым/P1
ме/P1
мед/P1N4
меда/P1
медад/P1
медаз/P1
медак/P1
медам/P1
медло/P1
медось/P1
мелэ/P1
мия/P1
на/P1
небось/P1
незнай/P1
неужели/P1
о/P1
о-веть/P1
ого/P1I1
ӧзтэ/P1
ойдолэ/P1
окмоз/P1D1
око/P1
оло-керек/P1
оло-но/P1
о-о-ведь/P1
осто/P1
остэ/P1
отэ/P1
пе/P1
погоди/P1
поди/P1
пожалуй/P1
пожалуйста/P1
пӧй/P1
привет/P1
пук/P1
пытсо/P1
ракмат/P1
сётаки/P1
сябась/P1
тани/P1
тани-тани/P1
тау/P1
тауэлэ/P1
тӥни/P1
тӥни-тани/P1
то/P1
то-то/P1
тото/P1
тямысмос/P1
угой/P1
угось/P1
ук/P1
уске/P1
чӧк/P1
ӵок/P1
чырккемесь/P1
шат/P1
шӧдске/P1
шуом/P1
ы-ы/P1I1
эн/P1
эсь/P1
ява/P1
явалэ/P1
яватэ/P1
ялэ/P1
ялэ-ка/P1
яралоз/P1
ярам/P1
ятэ/P1
я-я/P1
палась/R1N2P1
зира/P1
сё/P1
